test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verb-even_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable verbs belonging to BORRA_TV, DEAKCU_TV, DIEHTALADDA_TV, HAHTTIT_TV, BOAHTI_IV, DIEVVA_IV, RAIMMAHALLA_IV 

Tests:
  Verb - njuozzut: # BORRA_TV
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuoccun
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuozzu
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njuzzot
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: njuoccuiga
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njuoccuidet
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njuzzo
    njuozzut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: njuocco
    njuozzut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: njuzzoset
    njuozzut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [njuccoleimme, njuccošeimme, njuccoleimme]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [njuccolii, njuccošii, njuccolii]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [njuccoš, njuccoža]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: njuccožit
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ger: [njuoccudin, njuoccudiin, njuoccudettiin]
    njuozzut+V+TV+PrfPrc: njuzzon
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: njuzzojuvvot
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njuzzuidet
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njuozzugohten
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njuoccostalaiga
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njuoccuheasttát
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: njuozzumis

  Verb - čoallut: # DEAKCU_TV
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoalun
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoallu
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čollot
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: čoaluiga
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čoaluidet
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čollo
    čoallut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: čoalo
    čoallut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: čolloset
    čoallut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [čololeimme, čološeimme, čololeimme]
    čoallut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [čololii, čološii, čololii]
    čoallut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čološ, čoloža]
    čoallut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čoložit
    čoallut+V+TV+Ger: [čoaludin, čoaludiin, čoaludettiin]
    čoallut+V+TV+PrfPrc: čollon
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: čollojuvvot
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čolluidet
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čoallugohten
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/l+V+Der/adda+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [čollolattaiga, čoallulattaiga]
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čoaluheasttát
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: čoallumis

  Verb - addáladdat: # DIEHTALADDA_TV
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addálattan
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addáladdá
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: addáladdet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: addálattaiga
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: addálattaidet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: addáladde
    addáladdat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: addálatta
    addáladdat+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: addáladdoset
    addáladdat+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [addálattaleimme, addálattašeimme]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [addálattalii, addálattašii]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [addálattaš, addálattaža]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: addálattažit
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: addáladdojuvvot
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: addáladduidet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: addáladdagohten
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ger: [addálattadin, addálattadiin, addálattadettiin]
    addáladdat+V+TV+PrfPrc: addáladdan
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: addáladdamis

  Verb - mášohuhttit: # HAHTTIT_TV
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášohuhtán
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mášohuhttá
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mášohuhttet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: mášohuhtiiga
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mášohuhtiidet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mášohuhtte
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: mášohuhte
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: mášohuhttoset
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [mášohuhtáleimme, mášohuhtášeimme]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [mášohuhtálii, mášohuhtášii]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [mášohuhteš, mášohuhteža]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: mášohuhtežit
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: mášohuhttojuvvot
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mášohuhttuidet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mášohuhttigohten
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ger: [mášohuhtidin, mášohuhtidiin, mášohuhtidettiin]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+PrfPrc: mášohuhttán
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: mášohuhttimis

  Verb - boahtit: # BOAHTI_IV
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: boađán
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: boahtá
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bohtet
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bođiiga
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bođiidet
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: bohte
    boahtit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: boađe
    boahtit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bohtoset
    boahtit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [boađáleimme, boađášeimme]
    boahtit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [boađálii, boađášii]
    boahtit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bođeš, bođeža]
    boahtit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bođežit
    boahtit+V+IV+Ger: [boađidin, boađidiin, boađidettiin]
    boahtit+V+IV+PrfPrc: boahtán
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bohttojuvvot
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bohttui
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: boahtigohten
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [boađestalaiga, boađástalaiga]
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: boađiheasttát
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: boahtimis

  Verb - beassat: # DIEVVA_IV
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: beasan
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: beassá
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: besset
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: beasaiga
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: beasaidet
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: besse
    beassat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: beasa
    beassat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bessoset
    beassat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [beasaleimme, beasašeimme]
    beassat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [beasalii, beasašii]
    beassat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [beasaš, beasaža]
    beassat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: beasažit
    beassat+V+IV+Ger: [beasadin, beasadiin, beasadettiin]
    beassat+V+IV+PrfPrc: beassan
    beassat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bessojuvvot
    beassat+V+IV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bessui
    beassat+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: beassagohten
    beassat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: beasastalaiga
    beassat+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: beasaheasttát
    beassat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: beassamis

  Verb - ahccohallat: # RAIMMAHALLA_IV
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahccohalan
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ahccohallá
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ahccohallet
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: ahccohalaiga
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ahccohalaidet
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ahccohalle
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: ahccohala
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: ahccohalloset
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [ahccohalaleimme, ahccohalašeimme]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [ahccohalalii, ahccohalašii]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [ahccohalaš, ahccohalaža]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ahccohalažit
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ger: [ahccohaladin, ahccohaladiin, ahccohaladettiin]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+PrfPrc: ahccohallan
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ahccohallagohten
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: ahccohallamis
